California, session 20252026, AB2203.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66025.4 is added to the Education Code, to read:66025.4. Commencing with the 2028–29 academic year, the California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to both of the following:(a) A student who receives a fee waiver pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 66025.3.(b) A student who is using any federal GI Bill benefits.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.